North Dakota, session 69, HB1444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-05-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
24-05-17. Responsibility for county road system.
The boards of county commissioners in their respective counties have the sole authority and
responsibility to acquire land for, construct, maintain, and operate the county road system as
designated and selected by them. If a board of county commissioners determines a local road meets
the criteria in section 24 - 05 - 16 and is under the jurisdiction of the township, the board of county
commissioners shall notify the township of its intention to add the road to the county system. The board
of county commissioners shall hold a public meeting to receive input on the county's intention to add the
road to the county system. Following the public meeting, the board of county commissioners shall make
a decision at its subsequent scheduled meeting regarding adding the road to the county system.

H. B. NO. 1444 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1444.
House Vote: Yeas 74 Nays 16 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 29 Nays 15 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State